Wisconsin, session 2025, AB198.
do enact as follows:AB198,11Section 1. 38.04 (9m) of the statutes is created to read:AB198,2,6238.04 (9m) Emergency medical services education. (a) Subject to par. 3(b), the board shall provide grants to technical colleges that provide emergency 4medical services courses that train and prepare individuals for initial certification 5or initial licensure as an emergency medical responder, as defined in s. 256.01 (4p), 6or an emergency medical services practitioner, as defined in s. 256.01 (5).AB198,2,117(b) The board may not provide a grant under par. (a) to a technical college for 8use in any year in which, in regards to a emergency medical services course 9described in par. (a), the technical college’s district board or the technical college 10gives admission priority to residents based on the district in which the resident 11lives.AB198,21Section 2. 39.378 of the statutes is created to read:AB198,3,6239.378 Tuition and material costs for emergency medical services. (1) 3The board shall develop a program to reimburse the persons described under sub. 4(2) for the tuition and materials costs incurred in completing a course at a technical 5college in this state as necessary to qualify for initial licensure or initial 6certification.AB198,3,77(2) The following persons are eligible for reimbursement under this section:AB198,3,108(a) An individual who is applying for an initial license as an emergency 9medical services practitioner under s. 256.15 (6) (a) if the individual has personally 10paid the tuition or materials costs for the course.AB198,3,1311(b) An individual who is applying for initial certification as an emergency 12medical responder under s. 256.15 (8) (b) if the individual has personally paid the 13tuition or materials costs for the course.AB198,3,1514(c) The employer of an individual listed under par. (a) or (b) if the employer 15has paid for the applicant’s cost of tuition or materials for the course.AB198,3,1716(3) To be eligible for reimbursement under this section, a person described 17under sub. (2) shall satisfy the following criteria:AB198,3,1818(a) For individuals described under sub. (2) (a):AB198,3,20191. The individual has satisfactorily completed a course of instruction and 20training required under s. 256.15 (6) (a) 2.AB198,3,22212. The individual has passed any examination required under s. 256.15 (6) (a) 223.AB198,4,213. The individual has met all additional qualifications for licensure as may be 2required by the department of health services under s. 256.15 (6) (a) 4.AB198,4,434. The individual has received an initial license from the department of health 4services as an emergency medical services practitioner under s. 256.15 (6).AB198,4,85(b) For individuals described under sub. (2) (b), the individual has 6satisfactorily completed a course of instruction required under s. 256.15 (8) (b) 3. 7and has received certification as an emergency medical responder from the 8department of health services under s. 256.15 (8) (b).AB198,4,119(c) For employers who have paid for an individual’s costs of tuition or 10materials as described under sub. (2) (c), the individual satisfies the criteria under 11par. (a) or (b).AB198,4,1412(4) To receive reimbursement under this section, persons described under 13sub. (2) who are eligible for reimbursement under sub. (3) shall apply to the board 14for reimbursement on a form prescribed by the board.AB198,315Section 3. Nonstatutory provisions.AB198,4,1616(1) Live 911 pilot program.AB198,4,2017(a) Grants. The department of military affairs may through a pilot program 18distribute moneys through grants to public safety answering points to enable real-19time video and multimedia communications between public safety answering 20points and individuals who call for emergency services.AB198,5,421(b) Report. No later than October 15, 2027, the department of military affairs 22shall submit a report to the chief clerk of each house of the legislature for 23distribution to the legislature under s. 13.172 (2) on the performance of the pilot 1program under this subsection. The report shall include information on outcomes 2from the pilot program, the number of responses from dispatch that were altered 3due to increased information from the pilot program, and any cost savings 4associated with the pilot program.AB198,5,55